Louisiana, session 2026, HB1234.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:100(C)(2) and (3) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§100. Hit-and-run driving
* * *
C.
* * *
(2)(a) Whoever commits the crime of hit-and-run driving when death or
serious bodily injury is a direct result of the accident, when the driver knew or should
have known that death or serious bodily injury has occurred, and the driver's vehicle
was directly involved in the accident, shall be fined not more than five thousand
dollars or imprisoned with or without hard labor for not less than two years nor more
than ten years, two of which shall be served without the benefit of parole, probation,
or suspension of sentence, or both.
(b) If the victim is a pedestrian or a bicyclist, at least two years of the
sentence imposed shall be served without the benefit of parole, probation, or
suspension of sentence.
(3)(a) Whoever commits the crime of hit-and-run driving, where all of the
following conditions are met, shall be imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for not
less than five years nor more than twenty years:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1234 ENROLLED
(a) (i) Death or serious bodily injury is a direct result of the accident.
(b) (ii) The driver knew or must should have known that the vehicle he was
operating was involved in an accident or that his operation of the vehicle was the
direct cause of an accident.
(c) (iii) The driver had been previously convicted of any of the following:
(i) (aa) A violation of R.S. 14:98, or a law or an ordinance of any state or
political subdivision prohibiting operation of any vehicle or means of transportation
or conveyance while intoxicated, impaired, or while under the influence of alcohol,
drugs, or any controlled dangerous substance on two or more occasions within ten
years of this offense.
(ii) (bb) A violation of R.S. 14:32.1-vehicular homicide. (vehicular
homicide)
(iii) (cc) A violation of R.S. 14:39.1-vehicular negligent injuring. (vehicular
negligent injuring)
(iv) (dd) A violation of R.S. 14:39.2-first degree vehicular negligent injuring.
(first degree vehicular negligent injuring)
(b) If the victim is a pedestrian or a bicyclist, at least five years of the
sentence imposed shall be served without the benefit of parole, probation, or
suspension of sentence.
Section 2. This Act shall be cited and referred to as the "Christina Larsen Act".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.